District of Columbia statutes.
5-1307

Protection of emergency 2-way radio communications — Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to do the following:

(1)

Knowingly, intentionally, recklessly, or with culpable negligence interrupt, disrupt, impede, or otherwise interfere with the transmission of a 2-way radio communication, the purpose of which is to inform or to inquire about an emergency; or

(2)

Knowingly, intentionally, recklessly, or with culpable negligence transmit false information about an emergency on any 2-way radio frequency.

Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-105, § 3, 33 DCR 1162
This section is referenced in § 5-1306.
1981 Ed., § 4-1107.